Idaho, session 2026, S1360.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-454, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-454. PROJECT CHOICE FEE. (1) A project choice program fee of three
dollars ($3.00) eight dollars ($8.00) shall be collected in addition to each
registration fee assessed pursuant to section 49-402(1), (2) or (3), 49-411,
49-412 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code. Such fees shall be deposited to the Idaho
law enforcement fund established in section 67-2914, Idaho Code.
(2) The project choice program fee shall be collected and deposited
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for registrations for calendar
year 2007 and thereafter.
(3) The project choice fee shall be used, subject to appropriation,
exclusively for the purposes of creating a career ladder within the Idaho
state police and to provide salaries to encourage the hiring and retention
of trained and qualified employees for Idaho state police positions. Idaho
state police personnel who have participated in and benefited from the use of
the project choice fee, as of July 1, 2010, shall continue to participate in
and benefit from the project choice fee while employed by the Idaho state po-
lice. Provided however, that beginning July 1, 2010, the use of the project
choice fee shall be restricted in the following manner: the project choice
fee shall be used exclusively for the purposes of creating a career ladder
for commissioned officers, dispatch personnel and forensic personnel within
the Idaho state police; and to provide salaries to encourage the hiring and
retention of trained and qualified commissioned officers, dispatch person-
nel and forensic personnel.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-2914, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2914. IDAHO LAW ENFORCEMENT FUND ESTABLISHED. (1) For the purposes
of the Idaho state police, there is established in the state treasury of the
state of Idaho the Idaho law enforcement fund, to which shall be deposited
funds as provided by law.
(2) At the beginning of each fiscal year, moneys derived from the
project choice program fee, as provided in section 49-454, Idaho Code, that


are in the Idaho law enforcement fund and that exceed two hundred percent
(200%) of that fiscal year's appropriation, as certified by the state trea-
surer, shall be transferred to the general fund.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.